Maryland, session 2026, HB1433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
16–701.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1433*

HOUSE BILL 1433
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) (1) “Faculty” means employees whose assignments involve academic
responsibilities, including teachers and department heads.
(2) “Faculty” does not include officers, supervisory employees, confidential
employees, part–time faculty, or student assistants.
(o) (1) “Public employee” means an employee employed by a public employer.
(2) “Public employee” includes faculty and part–time faculty at the
Baltimore City Community College.
(3) “Public employee” does not include:
(i) Officers;
(ii) Supervisory or confidential employees; or
(iii) Student assistants.
(Q) (1) “SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE WHO HAS
AUTHORITY TO:
(I) HIRE, TRANSFER, SUSPEND, LAY OFF, RECALL, PROMOTE,
DISCHARGE, ASSIGN, REWARD, OR DISCIPLINE EMPLOYEES;
(II) RESPONSIBLY DIRECT EMPLOYEES FOR MORE THAN 50%
OF THE EMPLOYEE’S WORKING HOURS; AND
(III) ADDRESS AND RESOLVE EMPLOYEE COMPLAINTS.
(2) “SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A DEPARTMENT
HEAD OR AN EMPLOYEE IN A COMPARABLE POSITION OR ANY FACULTY MEMBER
BELOW THE LEVEL OF ASSISTANT DEAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.